Utah statutes.
17-53-206.   Meetings to comply with open meetings law -- Records and
minutes -- Compelling attendance at meetings of legislative body.
(1)  Each meeting of the county legislative body shall comply with Title 52,
Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.
(2)  The chair and clerk of the county legislative body shall sign the records
and minutes of the county legislative body.
(3)  The legislative body of a county may compel the attendance of its own
members at its meetings and provide penalties it considers necessary for the
failure to comply with an exercise of the authority to compel attendance.
